New York, session 2025-2026, A6724.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 403-c to read as follows: 3 § 403-c. Surrender of registration and number plates. 1. Any person 4 who has had their license suspended or revoked pursuant to subdivision 5 two or two-a of section five hundred ten or subdivision one or three of 6 section five hundred ten-a of this chapter for conduct relating to the 7 operation of a motor vehicle shall surrender to the department the 8 number plates of all motor vehicles which such person has registered 9 pursuant to this article, and shall have any motor vehicle registrations 10 which belong to such person suspended. Such surrender of number plates 11 and vehicle suspension or suspensions shall remain in effect as long as 12 the suspension or revocation of such driver's license. 13 2. All motor vehicles registered to such person shall not be regis- 14 tered or reregistered in the name of such person, or in any other name 15 where the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe that such 16 registration or reregistration will have the effect of defeating the 17 purposes of this section, and no other motor vehicle shall be registered 18 in the name of such person during the period of such suspension. 19 3. Except as provided in subdivision five of section four hundred 20 twenty-eight of this title, refunds of fees assessed pursuant to this 21 article and article fourteen-A of this title shall not be provided when 22 suspension is mandated pursuant to subdivision one of this section. 23 4. a. The commissioner or their duly authorized agent shall notify 24 each person whose license has been suspended or revoked of such person's EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01803-01-5 A. 6724 2 1 obligation to surrender the number plates of any motor vehicles which 2 such person has registered pursuant to this article, and of the suspen- 3 sion of any vehicle registrations in such person's name. 4 b. Such notice shall include the name and address of the person whose 5 license has been suspended or revoked, the vehicle registration number 6 or numbers which are suspended, the number plates of the vehicle or 7 vehicles which must be surrendered, the infraction, infractions, offense 8 and/or offenses for which the registration is suspended and number 9 plates must be surrendered, and the dates and times of the convictions 10 for such infractions and/or offenses. 11 c. The notice shall also contain a warning advising the person of the 12 consequences of failure to surrender number plates. 13 d. The notice required by this subdivision shall be provided by first 14 class mail to the registrant of the motor vehicle within thirty days of 15 the license suspension or revocation. 16 e. Such person shall surrender any number plates for any vehicle for 17 which the person is the registrant within fourteen days of receiving 18 notice from the department. Failure to surrender number plates upon 19 notice shall constitute an infraction, punishable upon conviction by a 20 fine not less than one hundred fifty dollars nor more than five hundred 21 dollars or imprisonment for not more than fifteen days or both such fine 22 and imprisonment. 23 5. A waiver of the provisions of subdivisions one and two of this 24 section shall be available for motor vehicles which are jointly used by 25 spouses or other immediate family members if the implementation of such 26 subdivision would result in an extreme hardship for the spouse or family 27 member whose license has not been suspended or revoked. To be eligible 28 for an extreme hardship exception, a duly licensed spouse or immediate 29 family member must furnish proof acceptable to the commissioner or their 30 duly authorized agent that such person jointly uses a motor vehicle 31 whose registration and number plates would otherwise be subject to 32 suspension or surrender pursuant to subdivision one or two of this 33 section. Acceptable proof shall include without limitation the spouse or 34 immediate family member being named in a policy of liability insurance 35 for the motor vehicle pursuant to article seven of this chapter before 36 the date of conviction, and any additional factors that the commissioner 37 or their duly authorized agent deems necessary to establish joint use. 38 The commissioner or their duly authorized agent shall determine whether 39 an individual qualifies as an immediate family member, provided that 40 such definition of immediate family members shall include without limi- 41 tation domestic partners as defined in section four of the workers' 42 compensation law and any children of the registrant. 43 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 44 it shall have become a law.